Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 6
PROPERTY ENCUMBRANCES, BUSINESS COMBINATIONS,
AND PROPERTY SALES

7-56-601. Encumbering property.

The board of a cooperative has full power and authority, without approval of its members, to mortgage, pledge, encumber, dedicate to the repayment of indebtedness, whether with or without recourse, or otherwise encumber any or all of the cooperative's property, whether or not in the usual and regular course of business, and to execute and deliver mortgages, deeds of trust, security agreements, or other instruments for such purposes.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 512, § 1, effective July 1.

7-56-602. Merger, conversion, or consolidation or share or equity capital exchange.

One or more cooperatives formed under or that have elected to be subject to this article may be merged, consolidated, or shares or equity capital exchanged with another domestic cooperative or another domestic entity, or may convert to any form of entity permitted by section 7-90-201, upon such terms, for such purpose, and by such domestic entity name as may be agreed upon, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title.

With respect to a cooperative that is a party to a plan of merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange, unless a different vote is required by the articles or bylaws, the plan shall be approved by a two-thirds majority of all the members of the board of the cooperative and by a two-thirds majority of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1). If a higher or lower percentage vote of members is required by the articles or bylaws for approval, not less than a majority of those present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1) nor more than a two-thirds majority of all voting members of the cooperative shall be required.

A cooperative shall not permit proportional voting to apply to a vote of members on a plan of merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange pursuant to this section.

If voting by mail is permitted, the notice of the meeting shall be mailed to each member and have a mail ballot attached to it.

A cooperative may establish different requirements for plans between or among two or more cooperatives and for plans where a noncooperative entity is a party to the plan.

The vote required for approval of a plan by an entity that is a party to the plan and that is not a cooperative entity shall be governed by the law applicable to the noncooperative entity.

If a party to the merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange is the owner of real property in the state of Colorado and the merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange would affect the title to the real property, a copy of a statement of merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange, certified by the secretary of state, shall be filed for record in the office of the county clerk and recorder in the county or counties in which the real property is situated.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 512, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(3) amended, p. 1818, § 25, effective July 1; (3) amended, p. 1682, § 23, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1) and (2)(e) amended, p. 2229, § 94, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(3) amended, p. 1414, § 52, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(3) amended, p. 848, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(b), and (3) amended, p. 219, § 3, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-603. Procedure for consolidation, share or equity capital exchange, conversion, and merger.

A plan for consolidation or share or equity capital exchange must state the following:

The entity name of each entity planning to consolidate or exchange shares or equity capital and the principal office address of its principal office;

The entity name of the surviving entity, or of the acquiring entity, and the principal office address of its principal office;

A statement that the consolidating entities are consolidated with the surviving entity, or that the acquiring entity is acquiring shares or equity capital of the other entities, and the section of this article pursuant to which the consolidation or exchange is effected;

Any amendments to the articles of the surviving party to be effected by the consolidation or equity capital exchange; and

With respect to agricultural and other cooperatives exempted from the operation of laws such as the federal and state securities or antitrust laws, any steps necessary to maintain such exemption if the cooperative wishes to maintain such status.

The plan of consolidation or share or equity capital exchange may state any other provisions relating to the consolidation or share or equity capital exchange.

(2.3) A plan of conversion shall comply with section 7-90-201.3.

(2.7) A plan of merger shall comply with section 7-90-203.3.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed to limit the power of a cooperative or other entity to acquire all or part of the shares or equity capital of another cooperative through a voluntary exchange or through an agreement with the members of such other cooperative.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 513, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(a) to (1)(d), and (2) amended, p. 2230, § 95, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(d) RC&RE, p. 1415, § 53, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(1), (1)(a), (1)(c), (1)(d), and (2) amended and (2.3) and (2.7) added, p. 220, § 4, effective May 29.

L. 2019:

IP(1), (1)(c), and (1)(d) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1964, § 64, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-604. Merger of parent and subsidiary.

Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 7-56-602 and 7-56-603, by complying with the provisions of this section, any parent cooperative owning one hundred percent of the voting shares, memberships, or interests and having a right to vote of a subsidiary may either merge such subsidiary into itself or merge itself into such subsidiary.

The boards of the parent cooperative and of the subsidiary shall adopt by resolution, and the members of both the parent cooperative and the subsidiary shall approve, a plan of merger that states the following:

The entity names of the parent cooperative and subsidiary and the entity name of the surviving party;

The terms and conditions of the proposed merger;

The manner and basis of converting the shares of the parent cooperative and subsidiary into shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving party or any other cooperative into money or other property in whole or part;

Any amendments to the articles of the surviving party to be effected by the merger; and

Any other provisions relating to the merger as are deemed necessary or desirable.

The members of the parent cooperative shall not be required to vote on the merger unless the articles, bylaws, or the board requires otherwise; except that if, as a result of the merger, the voting shares, memberships, or other interests of members of the parent cooperative would be materially altered, then the members of the parent cooperative shall have the right to vote on the plan of merger. If the members of the parent cooperative have the right to vote on the plan of merger, the parent cooperative shall mail a copy or summary of the plan of merger to each member of the parent cooperative who has the right to vote on the plan and all parties to the merger. Notice and meeting requirements as provided for in this article shall apply.

If the members of the parent cooperative have the right to vote on the plan of merger, unless the articles, bylaws, or the board requires a greater or lesser vote, the plan of merger, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange shall be approved by a majority of the members of the parent cooperative present and voting on the plan in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1). Upon approval of a plan of merger pursuant to this section, a statement of merger shall be delivered to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, and a copy of the statement of merger, certified by the secretary of state, shall be filed for record in each of the counties, if any, in which such filing is required by section 7-56-602 (3).

(Deleted by amendment, L. 98, p. 612, § 6, effective July 1, 1998.)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 514, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

IP(2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 612, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1818, § 26, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 1682, § 24, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2) and (2)(a) amended, p. 2230, § 96, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(2)(a) amended, p. 1415, § 54, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(4) amended, p. 849, § 3, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-604.5. Statement of merger or conversion.

After a plan of merger is approved, the surviving entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of merger pursuant to section 7-90-203.7. If the plan of merger provides for amendments to the articles of incorporation of the surviving entity, the surviving entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, articles of amendment effecting the amendments.

After a plan of conversion is approved, the converting entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of conversion pursuant to section 7-90-201.7.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1415, § 55, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 220, § 5, effective May 29.

7-56-605. Statement of consolidation or share or equity capital exchange.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1415, § 56, effective July 1, 2004.)

After a plan of consolidation or share or equity capital exchange is approved by all necessary action of all parties, the acquiring entity shall deliver to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title 7, a statement of consolidation or a statement of exchange stating:

The entity name of each entity that is a party to the consolidation or the shares of which will be acquired and the principal office address of its principal office;

The entity name of the consolidated or acquiring entity and the principal office address of its principal office; and

The effective date of the consolidation or share or equity capital exchange.

and (d) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1415, § 56, effective July 1, 2004.)

The consolidation or share or equity capital exchange shall be effective as provided in section 7-90-304.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 515, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1), IP(2), and (3) amended, p. 1818, § 27, effective July 1; (1), IP(2), and (3) amended, p. 1683, § 25, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

IP(2), (2)(c), and (2)(d) amended and (2)(c.5) added, p. 2230, § 97, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1415, § 56, effective July 1.

L. 2019:

IP(2) amended, (SB 19-086), ch. 166, p. 1965, § 65, effective July 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-606. Effect of merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange.

The effect of a merger is determined by section 7-90-204.

The effect of a conversion is determined by section 7-90-202.

When a consolidation takes effect:

Each nonsurviving party to the consolidation consolidates into the surviving party, and the separate existence of every party to the consolidation except the surviving party ceases;

The title to all real estate and other property owned by each nonsurviving party is transferred to and vested in the surviving party without reversion or impairment. Such transfer to and vesting in the surviving party shall be deemed to occur by operation of law, and no consent or approval of any other person shall be required in connection with any such transfer or vesting unless such consent or approval is specifically required in the event of consolidation by law or by express provision in any contract, agreement, decree, order, or other instrument to which any of the parties so consolidated is a party or by which it is bound.

The surviving party has all liabilities of each party to the consolidation;

A proceeding pending against any party to the consolidation may be continued as if the consolidation did not occur or the surviving party may be substituted in the proceeding for the party whose existence ceased;

The articles of the surviving party are amended to the extent provided in the plan of consolidation; and

The shares of each such party to the consolidation that are to be converted into shares, obligations, or other securities of the surviving or any other party or into money or other property are converted, and the former holders of the shares or equity capital are entitled only to the rights provided in the statement of consolidation.

When a share or equity capital exchange takes effect, the shares or equity capital of each acquired party are exchanged as provided in the plan, and the former holders of the shares or equity capital are entitled only to the exchange rights provided in the articles of share or equity capital exchange.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 515, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1) amended, p. 1416, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

Entire section amended, p. 220, § 6, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-606.5. Merger with foreign entity.

One or more domestic cooperatives may merge with one or more foreign entities if:

The merger is permitted by section 7-90-203 (2);

The foreign entity complies with section 7-90-203.7 if it is the surviving entity of the merger; and

Each domestic cooperative complies with the applicable provisions of sections 7-56-602 and 7-56-603 and, if it is the surviving cooperative of the merger, with section 7-56-604.5.

Upon the merger taking effect, the surviving foreign entity of a merger shall comply with section 7-90-204.5.

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 222, § 7, effective May 29.

7-56-607. Consolidation or share or equity capital exchange with foreign business.

One or more domestic cooperatives may consolidate or enter into a share or equity capital exchange with one or more foreign entities if:

In a consolidation, the consolidation is permitted by the law of the jurisdiction under which each foreign entity is formed and each foreign entity complies with that law in effecting the consolidation;

In a share or equity capital exchange, the cooperative whose shares or equity will be acquired is a domestic or foreign cooperative, and if a share or equity capital exchange is permitted by the law of the jurisdiction under the law of which the acquiring entity is formed;

The foreign entity complies with the provisions of section

7-56-605

if it is the surviving or new entity in a consolidation or acquiring entity in a share or equity capital exchange; and

The foreign entity is the surviving entity in the consolidation or the acquiring entity of the share or equity capital exchange and it complies with section

7-56-605

.

(1.5) (Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 222, § 8, effective May 29, 2007.)

Upon the consolidation or share or equity capital exchange taking effect, the surviving foreign entity of a consolidation and the acquiring foreign entity of a share or equity capital exchange:

Shall either:

Appoint a registered agent if the foreign entity has no registered agent and maintain a registered agent pursuant to part 7 of article 90 of this title, whether or not the foreign entity is otherwise subject to that part, to accept service in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising with respect to any domestic entity that is merged into the foreign entity or the ownership interests of which are acquired in a share or equity capital exchange; or

Be deemed to have authorized service of process on it in connection with any such proceeding by mailing in accordance with section 7-90-704 (2); and

Shall comply with part 8 of article 90 of this title if it is to transact business or conduct activities in this state.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1417, § 58, effective July 1, 2004.)

Subsection (2) of this section does not prescribe the only means, or necessarily the required means, of serving a surviving foreign entity in a consolidation or an acquiring foreign entity in a share or equity capital exchange.

This section does not limit the power of a foreign entity to acquire all or part of the shares of one or more classes or series of a domestic cooperative through a voluntary exchange of shares or otherwise.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 516, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(2)(a)(II) amended, p. 1819, § 28, effective July 1; (2)(a)(II) amended, p. 1683, sect; 26, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) amended, p. 2231, § 98, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1)(c), (1)(d), IP(2), (2)(a)(II), (3), and (4) amended and (1.5) added, p. 1417, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(1)(d) amended, p. 1488, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(1), (1.5), and (2)(a)(I) amended, p. 222, § 8, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

7-56-608. Dissenters' rights - definitions.

As used in this section:

"Dissenter" means a member eligible to vote who exercises the right to dissent provided in this section at the time and in the manner required by this section.

"Interest" means interest required to be paid pursuant to this section at the average rate currently paid by the cooperative subject to this section on its principal bank loans or, if none, at the legal rate specified in section 5-12-101, C.R.S.

"Stated value" means the original cost paid by a person for capital stock or membership fees, as recorded in the records of the cooperative, in order to qualify for membership and the right to vote in the cooperative, and for other equity capital the amount stated in the records of the cooperative that is required to make a payment under this section.

If the board of a cooperative subject to this article submits to the members of the cooperative for approval a plan of merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange and if following the merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange there will be members of any cooperative involved in the proposed transaction who would no longer be eligible for membership or other voting interest in the surviving or resulting entity, the ineligible members shall be entitled to repayment of their equity interests in the cooperative in accordance with this section.

If the board of a cooperative subject to this article submits to the members of the cooperative for approval a plan to sell all or substantially all of the cooperative's assets and not dissolve following the sale, the members of the cooperative shall be entitled to repayment of their equity interests in the cooperative in accordance with this section.

A cooperative that proposes to be a party to a merger, conversion, consolidation, share or equity capital exchange, or a sale of assets, as described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section, shall include in the notice of the membership meeting at which the vote of the members is taken thereon an explanation of the right to dissent and the requirement to give written notice of intent to demand payment by a member having the right to do so under this section.

A member who may be entitled to repayment of the member's equity interests in the cooperative in accordance with this section shall give written notice of the member's intention to demand payment before the vote is taken at the membership meeting at which a vote on the proposed merger, conversion, consolidation, share or equity capital exchange, or sale of assets is to be taken. Upon giving notice, the member shall no longer be entitled to vote on the proposed transaction. The written notice shall include the name of the member in which the stock or membership is held on the records of the cooperative and the member's address and social security or federal tax identification number. Failure to give written notice of intention to demand payment in the prescribed manner disqualifies the member from demanding payment under this section.

If the merger, conversion, consolidation, share or equity capital exchange, or sale of assets described in subsection (2) or (3) of this section is approved by the members of the cooperative in the manner applicable to any other entity that is a party to the transaction, the surviving, resulting, or new entity, including a cooperative that is to sell all or substantially all of its assets, shall be required to make the payments provided in this section. The surviving, resulting, or new entity shall give written notice to all dissenters who have given notice to dissent pursuant to this section. The notice shall include the address at which the surviving, resulting, or new entity will receive payment demands, the requirement to submit stock or membership certificates or certification of the loss or destruction thereof, the period in which demands will be received which shall be not less than thirty days from the date of the notice, and where applicable, a statement of qualifications for membership or other voting interest in the surviving or new entity.

Within the period stated in the notice described in subsection (6) of this section, a dissenter may deliver a written demand for payment to the surviving, resulting, or new entity, or in the case of a sale of assets subject to this section, to the cooperative selling its assets, stating the address to which payment is to be made and, where applicable, a statement as to the reasons why the dissenter no longer qualifies for membership or a voting interest in the surviving, resulting, or new entity.

Within thirty days after receipt of a demand for payment, the surviving, resulting, or new entity or, in the case of a sale of assets subject to this section, the cooperative selling its assets shall pay to the dissenter:

The stated value of the initial investment of the dissenter in stock or membership fees in the cooperative as recorded in the records of the cooperative made to qualify the dissenter to be a member of the cooperative; and

The stated value of all other equity capital of the dissenter in the cooperative as recorded in the records of the surviving, resulting, or new entity, or in the case of a sale of assets subject to this section, of the cooperative selling its assets; except that, in the case of any merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange, if the surviving, resulting, or new entity has, by written agreement or operation of law other than this section, become liable to repay the other equity capital of the dissenter, the repayment of other equity capital shall be made by the surviving, resulting, or new entity under the same conditions and time frame, but not more than fifteen years, that would have applied if the member or equity holder had withdrawn or been terminated from the cooperative that is not the surviving, resulting, or new entity immediately prior to the effective date of the merger, conversion, consolidation, or share or equity capital exchange. If payment is not made on the date required by this subsection (8), the recipient shall be entitled to interest from the date the payment should have been made until the date payment is actually made.

Notwithstanding any provisions of law to the contrary, holders of equity capital who are not members of the cooperative shall under no circumstances be entitled to dissenter's rights.

Section 7-90-206 (2) applies to a conversion in which the cooperative is the converting entity.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 517, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(7) amended, p. 2232, § 99, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2006:

(10) added, p. 849, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2), (4), (5), (6), (7), IP(8), and (8)(b) amended, p. 223, § 9, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former §§ 7-55-112, 7-56-108, 7-56-121, and 7-56-126 as they existed prior to 1996.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this article, see § 7-90-102.

7-56-609. Sale or other disposition of property without member approval.

A cooperative may, on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board:

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of any of its property in the usual and regular course of business; except that a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of its property shall never be considered to be in the usual and regular course of business;

Transfer to itself any or all of the property of a domestic or foreign entity when all the voting rights of the transferor are owned, directly or indirectly, by the transferee cooperative.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles or bylaws, approval by the members of a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section is not required.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 520, § 1, effective July 1.

7-56-610. Sale or other disposition of property requiring member approval.

A cooperative may sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of its property, with or without its good will, only on the terms and conditions and for the consideration determined by the board and if the board proposes or submits and the members approve the transaction. A sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of a cooperative, with or without its good will, in connection with its dissolution, other than pursuant to a court order, shall be subject to the requirements of this section; but a sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of a cooperative, with or without its good will, pursuant to a court order shall not be subject to the requirements of this section. If a resolution to dissolve the cooperative that is adopted by the members of a cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-702 contemplates the sale of all or substantially all of the cooperative's property in connection with the dissolution, the adoption of that resolution by the members shall also be an authorization to sell all or substantially all of the cooperative's property pursuant to this section.

If a cooperative is entitled to vote or otherwise consent, other than in the usual and regular course of its business, with respect to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of its property with or without the good will of another entity that it controls, and if the shares or other interests held by the cooperative in such other entity constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the cooperative, then the cooperative shall consent to such transaction only if its board proposes and its members approve the giving of consent.

For a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or a consent described in subsection (2) of this section to be approved by the members:

The board, by a two-thirds majority vote of all its members, shall recommend the transaction or the consent to the members unless the board determines that, because of conflict of interest or other special circumstances, it should make no recommendation and communicates the basis for its determination to the members with the submission of the transaction or the consent; and

The members entitled to vote on the transaction or the consent shall approve the transaction or the consent as provided in subsection (6) of this section.

The board may condition the effectiveness of the transaction or the consent on any basis.

The cooperative shall give proper notice to each member entitled to vote on the transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or the consent described in subsection (2) of this section of the members' meeting at which the transaction or the consent will be voted upon. The notice shall:

State that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider:

In the case of action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of the cooperative; or

In the case of action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the cooperative's consent to the sale, lease, exchange, or other disposition of all, or substantially all, of the property of another entity, which entity shall be identified in the notice, shares or other interests of which are held by the cooperative and constitute all, or substantially all, of the property of the cooperative; and

Contain or be accompanied by a description of the transaction, in the case of action pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, or by a description of the transaction underlying the consent, in the case of action pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

Member approval of a transaction or consent described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section shall require an affirmative vote of two-thirds majority of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1); but the two-thirds voting requirement may be reduced to not less than a majority of the members present and voting in person or in any other manner authorized by the cooperative pursuant to section 7-56-305 (1), or may be increased to up to two-thirds of all members entitled to vote, by a provision contained in the articles or bylaws of the cooperative. The cooperative may also provide in its articles or bylaws for different voting requirements with respect to a transaction between one or more cooperatives subject to this article or similar law of other states and between the cooperative and one or more entities formed under or subject to different law of this or other states. A cooperative may not permit proportional voting to apply to a vote of members with respect to the sale of all or substantially all of the property of the cooperative pursuant to this section.

After a transaction described in subsection (1) of this section or a consent described in subsection (2) of this section is authorized, the transaction may be abandoned or the consent withheld or revoked, subject to any contractual rights or other limitations on such abandonment, withholding, or revocation, by a unanimous vote of the board or the vote of two-thirds of all the members.

If the members do not approve of a transaction or consent as described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the board may prohibit the consideration and submittal of a similar proposal to the members for a period of two years following the members' vote.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire article R&RE, p. 520, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(6) amended, p. 2232, § 100, effective July 1, 2004.